District of Columbia statutes.
4-536

Repealed

Preservation of civil actions; subrogation.

Repealed.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-100, § 7, 29 DCR 969
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-243, § 20, 44 DCR 1142
1981 Ed., § 3-406.
See note to § 4-531.